Massachusetts, session 194th, H4268.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The position of police lieutenant in the Town of Wrentham shall not be
subject to chapter 31 of the General Laws and related regulations applicable thereto.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this act shall not impair the civil service status of any person
holding the position of police lieutenant in the Town of Wrentham on the effective date of this
act.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage."; and to authorize the General
Court to make clerical and editorial changes of form only to the bill, unless the Select Board
approves amendments to the bill before enactment by the General Court, and the Select Board
shall be authorized to approve amendments which shall be within the scope of the general public
objectives of the petition; and (b) to further authorize the Select Board to take any and all other
of 2

action necessary or advisable to remove the position of police lieutenant in the Town of
Wrentham from Civil Service
of 2